Nebraska, session 109, LB691.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB691 LB691
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) On and after the effective date of this act, each
school board of a public school district and each governing board of an
approved or accredited private, denominational, or parochial school that
receives state funds shall display the Ten Commandments:
(a) In each classroom of an elementary school; and
(b) In each school building of a middle school or high school.
(2) The nature of the Ten Commandments display shall be determined
by each school board or governing board, but shall at a minimum:
(a) Focus on the text of the Ten Commandments in an easy-to-read
font;
(b) Be displayed on a poster or framed document that is at least
eleven inches by fourteen inches in size; and
(c) Include the following language:
The Ten Commandments
I AM the LORD thy God.
Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
Thou shalt not make to thyself any graven images.
Thou shalt not take the Name of the Lord thy God in vain.
Remember the Sabbath day, to keep it holy.
Honor thy father and thy mother, that thy days may be long upon the land
which the Lord thy God giveth thee.
Thou shalt not kill.
Thou shalt not commit adultery.
Thou shalt not steal.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbor.
Thou shalt not covet thy neighbor's house. Thou shalt not covet thy
neighbor's wife, nor his manservant, nor his maidservant, nor his cattle,
nor anything that is thy neighbor's.
(3) This section does not require a public school or an approved or
accredited private, denominational, or parochial school to spend funding
on the purchase of such display. A school board or a governing board may
-2-

LB691 LB691
2025 2025
accept contributions to defray the costs of implementing this section and
may accept donated displays that comply with the requirements of this
section.
(4) The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
-3-